Utah statutes.
63G-12-105.   Implementation to be consistent with federal law and civil rights.

A state or local agency shall implement this chapter in a manner that:

(1)  is consistent with federal laws that regulate immigration;

(2)  protects the civil rights of all persons; and

(3)  respects the privileges and immunities of United States citizens.



Enacted by Chapter 18, 2011 General Session

